Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 15. Radioactive Waste Storage Facilities

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Hazardous Waste — The Supreme Court's Interpretation of RCRA: An Inequitable Result. KFC Western, Inc. v. Meghrig, 516 U.S. 479, 116 S. Ct. 1251, 134 L. Ed. 2d 121, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 1955 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 699 (1997).

§ 35-11-1501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“High-level radioactive waste” means as defined in the “Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982” as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 10101 et seq.;

“High-level radioactive waste storage” means the emplacement of high-level radioactive waste or spent nuclear fuel regardless of the intent to recover that waste or fuel for subsequent use, processing or disposal;

“High-level radioactive waste storage facility” includes any facility for high-level radioactive waste storage, other than a permanent repository operated by a federal agency pursuant to the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, as amended. “High-level radioactive waste storage facility” includes an independent spent fuel storage installation as defined in title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations part 72 section 3;

“Spent nuclear fuel” means as defined in the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982 as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 10101 et seq.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 212, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-1502.
Application to site a high-level radioactive waste storage facility; requirements; payment of costs.

Any person undertaking the siting of any high-level radioactive waste storage facility shall do so in accordance with this article. Facilities subject to this article are exempt from the jurisdiction of the Industrial Development Information and Siting Act, W.S.

35-12-101

et seq.

Any person undertaking the siting of any facility governed by this section shall submit an application documenting the following information to the director:

The criteria upon which the proposed site was chosen, and information showing how the site meets the criteria of the nuclear regulatory commission and the department pursuant to W.S. 35-11-1506(c)(xvi);

The technical feasibility of the proposed waste management technology;

The environmental, social and economic impact of the facility in the area of study;

Conformance of the plan with the federal guidelines for a high-level radioactive waste storage facility.

The application shall be accompanied by an initial deposit of eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00) plus any excess amount collected from the feasibility agreement pursuant to W.S. 35-11-1506(c). Effective July 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the amount of the initial deposit shall be adjusted for inflation by the department using the consumer price index or its successor index of the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the calendar year immediately preceding the date of adjustment. The purpose of the initial deposit and additional monthly payments as billed to the applicant shall be to cover the costs to the state associated with the investigation, review and processing of the application and with the preparation and public review of the report required in W.S.

35-11-1503

and

35-11-1504

. Unused fees under this subsection shall be refunded to the applicant. The initial deposit shall be held in an interest bearing account in reserve by the department to guarantee that sufficient funds are available to pay for any outstanding costs incurred by the state in the event that the applicant is unable to complete the application process for any reason. Any costs to the state for application processing, preparation of the report required in W.S.

35-11-1503

and

35-11-1504

and for any other costs incurred by the state to fulfill any requirement of article 15 of this act, shall be billed by certified mail and reimbursed to the state by the applicant on a monthly basis at a rate established by the state for comparable other similar permitting reviews. The applicant may appeal the assessment to the department within twenty (20) days after receipt of the written notice. The appeal shall be based only upon the allegation that the particular assessment is erroneous or excessive. Failure of the applicant to pay within thirty (30) days of the date of mailing shall be cause for suspension or termination of the application process. Upon termination of the process, any unused sum remaining in said reserve account shall be returned to the applicant.

Any applicant for a permit to construct and operate a high-level radioactive waste storage facility shall share pertinent information relevant to both state and nuclear regulatory commission permitting. It is the intention of this article that an applicant can supply information common to both state and federal permitting, without duplication of effort.

Upon receipt of an application under subsection (b) of this section, the director shall, at the earliest possible date, apply for any funds which may be available to the state from the Interim Storage Fund or the Nuclear Waste Fund under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 10156 and 42 U.S.C. § 10222. The director may apply for other funds which may become available to the state under any other federal or state program for high-level radioactive waste storage facilities. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing the siting, construction or operation of any high-level radioactive waste storage facility not otherwise authorized under this article.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 212, § 1; 1999, ch. 163, § 1; 2017 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00) plus any excess amount collected from the feasibility agreement pursuant to
W.S. 35-11-1506(c)” for “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) plus any additional amount reverted pursuant to
W.S. 35-11-1506(c)”, added “Effective July 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the amount of the initial deposit shall be adjusted for inflation by the department using the consumer price index or its successor index of the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the calendar year immediately preceding the date of adjustment”; in (e), added “The director may apply for other funds which may become available to the state under any other federal or state program for high-level radioactive waste storage facilities.”

§ 35-11-1503.
Preparation of the report by the department.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the department shall within twenty-one (21) months of receipt of an application and the application fee under W.S.

35-11-1502

, prepare a report which examines the environmental, social and economic impacts of any proposal to site a high-level radioactive waste storage facility within the state. The director may determine that more than twenty-one (21) months is required to complete the report. If the director makes this determination, the director shall extend the deadline as appropriate and notify the applicant and the legislature of the additional time required. The director may employ experts, contract with state or federal agencies, or obtain any other services through contractual or other means to prepare the report.

Any report prepared under this section shall evaluate and assess all probable impacts associated with any proposal to site a high-level radioactive waste storage facility within the state, including but not limited to short term impacts and any other impacts which may be serious, reversible or irreversible. In developing the report under this section, the director may consider the guidelines and standards for preparation of an environmental impact statement under section 102(2)(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 4332(2)(C). If appropriate and to the extent practicable, the department shall prepare a joint report with the nuclear regulatory commission under the National Environmental Policy Act.

The report shall evaluate the environmental, social and economic impacts to the state from a range of alternative actions, including the siting of the high-level radioactive waste storage facility as proposed, the no action alternative and other alternatives.

The report shall include a proposed benefits agreement, which shall be negotiated with the person who proposes to site the high-level radioactive waste storage facility.

The director shall, in the preparation of the report, identify a recommended action from among the alternatives evaluated.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 212, § 1; 2017 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the department shall within twenty-one (21) months” for “The department shall within eighteen (18) months”, added “The director may determine that more than twenty-one (21) months is required to complete the report. If the director makes this determination, the director shall extend the deadline as appropriate and notify the applicant and the legislature of the additional time required”, and made a related change.

§ 35-11-1504.
Public review of any report for the siting of a high-level radioactive waste storage facility; submission to legislature.

The department shall submit any report prepared under W.S.

35-11-1503

for public review as required under this section. The public shall be afforded an opportunity to review the report and provide comments to the director. The director shall hold public hearings in the county or counties where the proposed storage facility will be located and throughout the state, to the extent practicable, to receive comments on the report.

Following any public review of the report as provided in this section, but in no event before the United States department of energy issues a final environmental impact statement in accordance with the law along with a license application for a permanent repository for high-level radioactive waste, the director shall submit the report to the legislature. The submission by the director shall include:

The report;

The director’s preferred or recommended alternative;

Any conditions proposed by the director regarding siting, construction, operation, monitoring, decontamination or decommissioning, or any other element of the proposed project that the director determines to be necessary to protect the public health or environment of the state, or to mitigate local or statewide social or economic impacts;

The proposed benefits agreement, including but not limited to:

The number of jobs that will be created in planning, permitting, licensing, site analysis and preparation, purchasing, construction, transportation, operation and decommissioning;

Local and state taxes generated by all aspects of the project;

Benefits from job training, education, communication systems, monitoring and security systems;

Mitigation payments to the affected communities;

Cash and other in kind benefits that will offset any adverse effects;

The duration of benefits from the project of all kinds.

A summary of and a discussion of the considerations given by the department to any public comments received.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 212, § 1; 2017 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “The director shall hold public hearings in the county or counties where the proposed storage facility will be located and throughout the state, to the extent practicable, to receive comments on the report” for “To the extent practicable, the director shall hold public hearings throughout the state to receive comments on the report”; in (b), substituted “statement in accordance with the law” for “statement with the Yucca mountain site recommendation submitted to the president of the United States” and “Yucca mountain as the permanent repository” for “a permanent repository”; and made a related change.

§ 35-11-1505.
Benefits agreement.

No benefits agreement shall be finally effective until authorized by the legislature under W.S.

35-11-1506

. The benefits agreement shall be sufficient to offset adverse environmental, public health, social or economic impacts to the state as a whole, and specifically to the local area hosting the storage facility. The benefits agreement shall be attached to and made part of any permit for the facility. Failure to adhere to the benefits agreement shall be considered grounds for enforcement up to and including permit termination. No benefits agreement as provided in this section shall limit or waive any rights afforded to the state by the Nuclear Waste Policy Act, as of March 1, 1995 [42 U.S.C. § 10101 et seq.], including any right to disapprove any site or siting.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 212, § 1.

Nuclear Waste Policy Act. —

The Nuclear Waste Policy Act is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 10101 et seq.

§ 35-11-1506.
Legislative approval of the siting of high-level radioactive waste storage facilities; conditions.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, no construction may commence, nor shall any high-level radioactive waste storage facility be sited within this state, unless the legislature has enacted legislation approving the siting, construction and operation of the facility in accord with this section. Any authorization of a facility under this section shall not be considered to grant to any person an exclusive right or franchise to store high-level radioactive wastes within the state.

In addition to any facility which meets the requirements of subsection (e) of this section, the legislature may authorize one (1) or more facilities under subsection (a) of this section if it finds that:

The siting of a high-level radioactive waste storage facility within the state is in the best interests of the people of Wyoming;

The siting of a high-level radioactive waste storage facility within the state can be accomplished without causing irreversible adverse environmental, public health, social or economic impacts to the state as a whole, and specifically to the local area hosting the proposed storage facility;

The proposed benefits agreement is sufficient to offset any adverse environmental, public health, social or economic impacts to the state as a whole, and specifically to the local area hosting the proposed storage facility; and

Sufficient safeguards, by contractual assurances or other means, exist to provide that:

The authorization to site, construct and operate any proposed storage facility shall be limited to no more than forty (40) years, provided that extensions may be granted if the legislature enacts legislation authorizing nuclear waste storage facilities to operate for more than forty (40) years;

Any wastes in storage at any facility shall remain the property of the waste generator or civilian nuclear power reactor owner, until transferred to permanent storage or until the federal government takes title to the wastes under the provisions of the Nuclear Waste Policy Act, 42 U.S.C. § 10101 et seq.;

Conditions substantially equivalent to the licensing conditions imposed upon monitored retrievable storage facilities under 42 U.S.C. § 10168(d) existing as of March 1, 1995 shall be effective for any high-level radioactive waste storage facility authorized under this article; and

There exists either a cooperative agreement between the state and the nuclear regulatory commission, or such other legally binding agreement for specific performance between the director and the applicant, which shall provide for state regulation of the facility.

With permission of the governor and the management council, an applicant for either a monitored retrievable storage facility or an independent spent fuel storage installation may enter into a preliminary but nonbinding feasibility agreement and study with the director which shall be submitted to and reviewed by the director, governor and the management council. The public shall be afforded a thirty (30) day public comment opportunity to review the feasibility agreement prior to its submission to the governor and the management council. The purposes of this feasibility agreement and study are to allow the state to make a preliminary determination, whether, on the basis of the feasibility agreement and study, the proposed benefits substantially outweigh any adverse effects and to allow an applicant based on the state’s preliminary review of any proposed benefit to determine whether or not a prudent investor, planner, builder and operator would decide to proceed with an application. Upon entering into a feasibility agreement, the applicant shall pay to the state a fee of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000.00). Effective July 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the fee shall be adjusted for inflation by the department using the consumer price index or its successor index of the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the calendar year immediately preceding the date of adjustment. The fee shall be used by the department for costs attendant to the preliminary agreement. Excess funds collected may be used by the department to review an application submitted under W.S.

35-11-1502

. Appropriate time shall be afforded the director, the governor, the management council and the applicant to prepare and to evaluate the preliminary agreement and study, but neither the state nor the applicant shall unnecessarily delay the feasibility agreement and study. The preliminary feasibility agreement and study shall not supersede nor replace other requirements under this act. This agreement and study shall set forth the following:

The source and adequacy of the financing for the facility and the applicant’s ability to fulfill the terms of any contract entered into regarding the siting, construction or operation of the facility. The information required under this paragraph shall include, but is not limited to, audited financial statements covering the five (5) year period prior to the feasibility agreement, a listing of all partners if the applicant is a partnership and a listing of all persons owning or controlling five percent (5%) or more of its stock if the applicant is a corporation;

Financial strengths of prospective storage customers;

The technical experience of the applicant and his associates in permitting before the nuclear regulatory commission, and in design, construction and operation of nuclear facilities;

The preliminary design plan and technical feasibility of the planned temporary fuel rod storage facility;

The best estimate of a range of costs for the permitting, planning and construction of the facility, based upon available information;

The proposed storage capacity of the planned facility, necessary to give reasonable assurance of economic feasibility, with evidence to show that the proposed storage capacity will not adversely affect the health and safety of Wyoming people or the environment;

How the applicant will proceed with the facility to assure that its construction, operation and decommissioning will neither temporarily nor permanently adversely affect the health and safety of Wyoming people;

A best estimate of a time frame required to obtain the necessary permits, including nuclear regulatory commission licensing, design and construction, and a suggested time frame for decisions by Wyoming government to meet the target timetable;

An outline of transportation plans, including rail and highway;

Substantial assurances that the facility is temporary, including options for that assurance including a time frame for the movement of the temporarily stored fuel rods to a permanent repository, delivery of the stored rods to reprocessing centers or to a purchaser, domestic or foreign, buying the rods for future reprocessing;

A range of benefits the nearby communities and the state might expect in return for temporarily storing the fuel rods, and a best estimate of when the benefits might begin to be received by the nearby communities and state;

A mutual review, by the state and applicant, of a range of taxes the state might reasonably impose on the facility and the fuel rods while they are in temporary storage including the annual acceptance taxes to be levied on fuel rods, based upon the kilograms of fuel rods stored at the Wyoming facility;

A description of security measures that would be installed in and around the facility to isolate and protect it from intruders;

A description of an emergency response procedure in the event of an unusual occurrence;

An outline of the information program an applicant would initiate to explain its plans to the community and state;

A description of site suitability characteristics and evidence that the applicant’s proposed site for the facility meets those characteristics;

Evidence of support from nearby Wyoming communities for exploring the project.

If the legislature authorizes the siting of a facility under subsection (a) of this section, the department shall issue a permit incorporating the conditions presented to the legislature including the benefits agreement. The issuance of the permit is not appealable to the environmental quality council. The permit shall also include a provision for payment by the permittee of inspection and review costs unless such costs are included in the benefits agreement.

The legislature hereby authorizes the siting of temporary high-level radioactive waste storage facilities within this state subject to the following:

A facility is authorized if:

It is operated on the site of and to store the high-level radioactive waste or spent nuclear fuel produced by a nuclear power generation facility operating within the state;

The facility has received a license to construct and operate from the United States nuclear regulatory commission;

The report required under paragraph (vi) of this subsection has been submitted; and

The operator of the facility is in compliance with paragraph (vii) of this subsection.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 103, § 2.

Not later than thirty (30) days before construction of a nuclear electric generation facility commences, the operator of the facility shall submit a report to the department that includes:

The number of jobs that will be created in the planning, permitting, licensing, site analysis and preparation, purchasing, construction, transportation, operation and decommissioning of the facility and what number of those jobs would be filled by Wyoming residents;

Local and state taxes that are estimated to be generated by all aspects of the construction, operation and decommissioning of the facility;

All benefits and impacts that will accrue to the state and the local community where the facility will be located, including benefits from job training, education, communication systems, monitoring and security systems.

The operator of each facility shall send to the department copies of all publicly available reports, notifications and violations sent to or from the United States nuclear regulatory commission or the operator of the facility as soon as practicable but not later than five (5) days after the operator sends or receives the report. The operator shall also transmit all information required under this subsection to emergency management departments of the local governments where the facility is located and shall make the information available on a public website.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 212, § 1; 2013 ch. 41, § 1, effective February 14, 2013; 2017 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 103, §§ 1, 2, effective March 21, 2022.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section,” to the beginning of the first sentence in (a); added “In addition to any facility which meets the requirements of subsection (e) of this section,” to the beginning of the first sentence in (b); and added (e).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “eighty thousand dollars ($80,000.00). Effective July 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the fee shall be adjusted for inflation by the department using the consumer price index or its successor index of the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the calendar year immediately preceding the date of adjustment” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00).”

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 103, §§ 1, 2, substituted “is” for “shall only be” in (e)(i); added (e)(i)(A) designation; in (e)(i)(A), added “high-level radioactive” and “or spent nuclear fuel”; added (e)(i)(B) through (e)(i)(D); added (e)(vi) and (e)(vii); and repealed former (e)(ii) through (e)(v), which read, “(ii) The applicant for the facility shall otherwise comply with the requirements of this act; (iii) The department shall review the application submitted pursuant to W.S.

35-11-1502

and determine specifically if the facility meets the safety considerations in paragraph (b)(iv) of this section and any other potential safety or environmental concerns; (iv) After preparation of the report under W.S.

35-11-1503

and public review under W.S.

35-11-1504

, the department may authorize siting and construction of the facility; (v) If a facility is authorized by the department under paragraph (iv) of this subsection, the benefits agreement shall be the agreement as negotiated with the applicant under W.S.

35-11-1503

(d).”

Laws 2022, ch. 103, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 21, 2022.

§ 35-11-1507.
Injunction proceedings; penalties.

When, in the opinion of the governor, a person is violating or is about to violate any provision of this article, the governor shall direct the attorney general to apply to the appropriate court for an order enjoining the person from engaging or continuing to engage in the activity. Upon a showing that the person has engaged, or is about to engage in the activity, the court may grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order or other order.

In addition to being subject to injunctive relief any person convicted of violating any provision of this article may be imprisoned for up to one (1) year, fined up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 212, § 1; 2017 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).”